Rhode Island, session 2025, SB775.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The title of Chapter 46-23 of the General Laws entitled "Coastal Resources
Management Council" is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 46-23
Coastal Resources Management Council
CHAPTER 46-23
DEPARTMENT OF COASTAL RESOURCES
SECTION 2. Sections 46-23-1, 46-23-2, 46-23-4, 46-23-4.1, 46-23-6, 46-23-6.1, 46-23-
6.2, 46-23-7, 46-23-7.1, 46-23-7.2, 46-23-7.4, 46-23-7.5, 46-23-8, 46-23-9, 46-23-10, 46-23-11,
46-23-13, 46-23-14, 46-23-15, 46-23-15.1, 46-23-16, 46-23-18, 46-23-18.1, 46-23-18.2, 46-23-
18.3, 46-23-18.4, 46-23-18.5, 46-23-18.6, 46-23-20, 46-23-20.1, 46-23-20.2, 46-23-20.3, 46-23-
20.4, 46-23-20.5, 46-23-20.6, 46-23-21, 46-23-22, 46-23-23, 46-23-24, 46-23-25 and 46-23-26 of
the General Laws in Chapter 46-23 entitled "Coastal Resources Management Council" are hereby
amended to read as follows:
46-23-1. Legislative findings.
(a)(1) Under article 1, § 17 of the Rhode Island Constitution, the people shall continue to
enjoy and freely exercise all the rights of fishery, and the privileges of the shore, to which they
have been heretofore entitled under the charter and usages of this state, including, but not limited
to, fishing from the shore, the gathering of seaweed, leaving the shore to swim in the sea and

passage along the shore; and they shall be secure in their rights to use and enjoyment of the natural
resources of the state with due regard for the preservation of their values; and it is the duty of the
general assembly to provide for the conservation of the air, land, water, plant, animal, mineral and
other natural resources of the state, and to adopt all means necessary and proper by law to protect
the natural environment of the people of the state by providing adequate resource planning for the
control and regulation of the use of the natural resources of the state and for the preservation,
regeneration, and restoration of the natural environment of the state.
(2) The general assembly recognizes and declares that the coastal resources of Rhode
Island, a rich variety of natural, commercial, industrial, recreational, and aesthetic assets, are of
immediate and potential value to the present and future development of this state; that unplanned
or poorly planned development of this basic natural environment has already damaged or destroyed,
or has the potential of damaging or destroying, the state’s coastal resources, and has restricted the
most efficient and beneficial utilization of these resources; that it shall be the policy of this state to
preserve, protect, develop, and, where possible, restore the coastal resources of the state for this
and succeeding generations through comprehensive and coordinated long range planning and
management designed to produce the maximum benefit for society from these coastal resources;
and that preservation and restoration of ecological systems shall be the primary guiding principle
upon which environmental alteration of coastal resources will be measured, judged, and regulated.
(b)(1) That effective implementation of these policies is essential to the social and
economic well-being of the people of Rhode Island because the sea and its adjacent lands are major
sources of food and public recreation, because these resources are used by and for industry,
transportation, waste disposal, and other purposes, and because the demands made on these
resources are increasing in number, magnitude, and complexity; and that these policies are
necessary to protect the public health, safety, and general welfare. Pursuant to 16 U.S.C. § 1452
(“The Coastal Zone Management Act”), the general assembly hereby directs the council department
of coastal resources (referred to as “CRMC” the "department") to exercise effectively its
responsibilities in the coastal zone through the development and implementation of management
programs to achieve wise use of the land and water resources of the coastal zone.
(2) Furthermore, that implementation of these policies is necessary in order to secure the
rights of the people of Rhode Island to the use and enjoyment of the natural resources of the state
with due regard for the preservation of their values, and in order to allow the general assembly to
fulfill its duty to provide for the conservation of the air, land, water, plant, animal, mineral, and
other natural resources of the state, and to adopt all means necessary and proper by law to protect
the natural environment of the people of the state by providing adequate resource planning for the
LC001019 - Page 2 of 34

control and regulation of the use of the natural resources of the state and for the preservation,
regeneration, and restoration of the natural environment of the state.
(c) That these policies can best be achieved through the creation of a coastal resources
management council department of coastal resources as the principal mechanism for management
of the state’s coastal resources.
(d) The general assembly recognizes and declares that maintenance dredging is required to
remove natural silt accumulations; Rhode Island has not had a general maintenance dredging policy
and programs for ports, port facilities, channels, harbors, public and private marinas and boating
facilities, recreational facilities and habitat areas; other major coastal states have maintenance
dredging policies and in-water maintenance dredge disposal sites; as a result of the lack of a general
maintenance dredging policy and program and as a result there has been:
(1) A decrease in the depth of the Providence Channel from forty-four (44) feet in 1971 to
twenty-four (24) feet in 1996;
(2) Navigational restrictions on ocean going vessels through the state’s waterways and
channels; and
(3) A decrease in the number of available slips and moorings at marinas throughout the
state; and the lack of a maintenance dredging policy and programs have significant adverse
environmental and economic effects on the state and therefore it is in the best interest of the state,
the cities and towns of the state, and the citizens thereof for the state to have a general maintenance
dredging policy and programs to resolve issues related to dredge maintenance and disposal and
avoid future significant direct and indirect adverse impact on the environment and economy of the
state.
(e) The department of coastal resources management council is hereby designated as the
lead state agency for purposes of dredging in tidal waters and as such shall have the following
duties and responsibilities:
(1) To coordinate the interest of the state with regard to dredging;
(2) To formulate and adopt a state policy with regard to dredging which integrates those
interests;
(3) To cooperate with, negotiate, and to enter into agreements on behalf of the state with
the federal government and with other public bodies and private parties with regard to dredging;
(4) To act as the initial and primary point of contact for all applications to the state for
dredging projects in tidal waters;
(5) To develop, prepare, adopt pursuant to § 46-23-11, implement, and maintain a
comprehensive plan for dredge material management; and
LC001019 - Page 3 of 34

(6) To cooperate and coordinate with the departments of environmental management,
transportation, administration, and health, and the economic development corporation in the
conduct of these duties and responsibilities.
(f)(1) The legislature recognizes that under Article I, § 17, the submerged lands of the state
are impressed with a public trust and that the state is responsible for the protection of the public’s
interest in these lands. The state maintains title in fee to all soil within its boundaries that lies below
the high water mark, and it holds that land in trust for the use of the public. In benefiting the public,
the state preserves certain public rights which include, but are not limited to, fishery, commerce,
and navigation in these waters and the submerged lands that they cover.
(2) Since All the powers and duties previously vested in the coastal resources management
council since its establishment in 1971, are hereby transferred to the department of coastal resources
("department"). the CRMC The department has had the authority to manage and plan for the
preservation of the coastal resources of the state including, but not limited to, submerged lands.
The legislature hereby declares that, in light of the unique size, scope, and overall potential impact
upon the environment of large scale filling projects involving twenty-five (25) acres or more, any
lease of tidal lands, or any license to use those lands, is subject to approval, disapproval, or
conditional approval by the direct enactment of the general assembly by legislative action. The
CRMC department shall review all requests for leases, licenses to use the land, and other authority
to use the land made by any applicant prior to presentation of the request to the general assembly,
and the CRMC department shall make recommendations on the request to the general assembly.
With the exception of any and all projects to fill land of twenty-five (25) acres or more, the general
assembly hereby recognizes and declares that the CRMC department is delegated the sole and
exclusive authority for the leasing of submerged and filled lands and giving licenses for the use of
that land. Accordingly, the CRMC department will develop, coordinate, and adopt a system for the
leasing of submerged and filled lands, and licenses for the use of that land, and will ensure that all
leases and licenses are consistent with the public trust. Pursuant thereto, the CRMC department
shall impose a maximum fee of eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) per annum for any transatlantic
cable that makes landfall in Rhode Island. All such fees collected shall be deposited into the Bays,
Rivers and Watersheds Fund, established pursuant to § 46-31-12.1, and shall be disbursed
according to the purposes of that fund. Nothing contained in this subsection negates, repeals, or
alters the provisions, processes, and requirements for the leasing of submerged land for the conduct
of aquaculture as set out under chapter 10 of title 20. Therefore, nothing in this chapter shall be
construed to limit or impair the authority of the state, or any duly established agency of the state,
to regulate filling or dredging affecting tidal lands owned by the state or any other entity, and
LC001019 - Page 4 of 34

nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or impair the obligation of the applicant to obtain
all applicable regulatory approvals. Specifically, and without limiting the foregoing, nothing in this
subsection negates, repeals, or alters the provisions, processes, and requirements for water quality
certification contained in chapter 12 of this title.
(3) Definitions. As used in this chapter, the following words unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, shall have the following meanings:
(i) "Department" means the department of coastal resources as established herein.
(ii) "Director" means the director of the department of coastal resources as established
herein, or their duly authorized agent, unless stated otherwise.
(i)(iii) “Filled land” means portions of tidal lands which have been rendered by the acts of
man to be no longer subject to tidal action or beneath tidal waters.
(ii)(iv) “Tidal Lands” means those lands that are below the mean high water.
(iii)(v) “Mean high water” means a line of contour representing the 18.6 year average as
determined by the metonic cycle and/or its equivalent as evidenced by the records, tidal datum, and
methodology of the United States Coastal Geodetic Survey within the National Oceanic and
Atmospheric Administration.
46-23-2. Coastal resources management council created — Appointment of members.
Department of coastal resources – Transfer of responsibilities and community advisory
committee.
(a) There is hereby created the coastal resources management council. The coastal
resources management council shall consist of ten (10) members. Nine (9) members shall be
appointed by the governor, with advice and consent of the senate, and one member shall serve ex
officio. All current appointments to the coastal resources management council made by the
governor with advice and consent of the senate are hereby validated and ratified and those
appointees shall serve for the remainder of their term.
(1) Six (6) of the members shall be appointed or elected officials of local government: three
(3) of whom shall be appointed or elected officials in a municipality of fewer than twenty-five
thousand (25,000) in population, three (3) of whom shall be appointed or elected officials in a
municipality of more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) in population. The populations are to be
determined by the latest federal census. Elected or appointed municipal officials shall hold seats on
the council only so long as they remain in their elected or appointed office. Each municipal
appointment shall cease if the appointed or elected official shall no longer hold or change the office
which they held upon appointment. At least five (5) out of the six (6) appointed or elected members
must be appointed or elected in a coastal municipality. When the governor submits his or her
LC001019 - Page 5 of 34

appointments to the senate for advice and consent, the governor shall specify the appointed or
elected office that each municipal appointment holds; the population of the municipality
represented; and the member being replaced.
(2) Three (3) members shall be appointed by the governor from the public, with the advice
and consent of the senate, one of the public members and his or her successors shall reside in a
coastal municipality.
(3) All members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified; during the
month of January, the governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a member
to succeed the members whose term will then next expire for a term of three (3) years commencing
on the first day of February next following and until their successor is named and qualified. A
member shall be eligible for successive appointments. No more than two (2) persons on the council
shall be from the same municipality. A vacancy other than by expiration shall be filled in the
manner of the original appointment but only for the unexpired portion of the term.
(a) There is hereby established within the executive branch of the state government a
department of coastal resources. The head of the department shall be the director of the department
of coastal resources who shall be in the unclassified service and who shall be appointed by the
governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.
(1) Whenever, in any general law, public law or regulation the words “coastal resources
management council”, the “council” or “CRMC” shall appear, the same shall be deemed to refer to
and to mean the “department of coastal resources.” Whenever, in any general law, public law or
regulation the words “chairman” or “chairperson of the coastal resources management council”
shall appear, the same shall be deemed to refer to and mean the “director of the department of
coastal resources.”
(2) The director of the department of coastal resources ("director") assuming any duties
formerly imposed upon any other department, division, board, commission, or other agency shall
perform those duties, notwithstanding that those duties were formerly performed by a board,
council, department, or a single officer. Any ruling, decision, or order made by the director with
regard to matters within the director's jurisdiction shall be subject to any existing right of appeal to
a court of competent jurisdiction.
(b) There is hereby established a community advisory committee for the department of
coastal resources ("the committee"). The role of the committee is to provide the department with
input on policy initiatives and program improvements. The director shall schedule and hold public
committee meetings at least two (2) times per year.
(1) The committee shall consist of ten (10) members. Nine (9) members shall be appointed
LC001019 - Page 6 of 34

by the governor and one member shall serve ex officio. Members of the committee shall be
knowledgeable in coastal law, costal policy or coastal ecology. No two (2) members shall reside in
the same community; and
(4)(2) The director of the department of environmental management, or their designee,
shall serve ex officio. The ex-officio member shall not be counted as serving from any particular
municipality community.
(b) In addition to the foregoing voting members, the council may include a varying number
of other members who may serve in an advisory capacity without the right to vote and who may be
invited to serve by either the governor or the voting members. These advisory members may
represent the federal agencies such as the navy, coast guard, corps of engineers, public health
service, and the Federal Water Pollution Control Administration, and such regional agencies as the
New England River Basins Commission and the New England Regional Commission and any other
group or interest not otherwise represented.
(c) There may be established a coastal resources advisory committee which committee,
appointed by the executive director of the coastal resources management council, may include, but
not be limited to, representation from the following groups: one of whom may be a representative
of the university of Rhode Island graduate school of oceanography and the college of resources
development, one of whom may be a representative of the Sea Grant National College Program,
one of whom may be a representative of the army corps of engineers, one of whom may be a
representative of the federal environmental protection agency’s Narragansett Bay laboratory, one
of whom shall be a representative of the coastal resources management council, one of whom may
be the director of the department of environmental management; one of whom may be a member
of the Rhode Island Marine Trade Association and one of whom may be a representative of a
regional environmental group. The council director shall have the authority to appoint these
additional members to the other advisory committee committees, as is deemed necessary or
advisable by the advisory committee or the council director. It shall be the responsibility of the
committee to advise the coastal resources management council on environmental issues relating to
dredging and permitting related thereto, including, but not limited to, those issues defined in §§ 46-
23-18.1 — 46-23-18.3, inclusive.
(d) The council shall have the authority to form committees of other advisory groups as
needed from both its own members and others.
46-23-4. Officers of the council — Quorum and vote required for action. Attorneys
and employees of the department.
The governor shall select from the appointed members a chairperson and vice chairperson.
LC001019 - Page 7 of 34

The council shall thereupon select a secretary from among its membership or staff. The council
may engage staff, including legal counsel, as it deems necessary. A quorum shall consist of six (6)
members of the council. A majority vote of those present shall be required for action.
(a) Staff attorney. There is hereby created the position(s) of staff attorney to the director of
the department of coastal resources. The director is hereby empowered and directed to hire at least
one full-time staff attorney(s) consistent with this section. The staff attorney(s) shall be hired by
and serve at the pleasure of the director and shall serve in the unclassified service.
(1) The staff attorney(s) shall be an attorney(s)-at-law and shall not otherwise engage in
the practice of law. The staff attorney(s) shall represent the director and staff on all matters
including representation at department hearings. Nothing in this chapter shall limit the authority of
the attorney general, including the authority granted in § 42-9-6.
(b) The director may engage staff, as they deem necessary to carry out the department's
duties.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary and upon the effective date of this
section, all employees of the coastal resources management council shall be transferred to the
department of coastal resources and retain civil service status, title, rate of pay and benefits.
46-23-4.1. Executive director of coastal resources management. Coordination of
agencies.
The governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, an executive director
of coastal resources management who shall be an employee of the council and who shall not be a
member of the council. The executive director shall coordinate and liaison with the director of the
department of environmental management, and the executive director’s staff shall be at the same
staff level as the other executive directors, and the executive director shall work directly with the
other division leaders. The executive director of coastal resources management shall be in the
unclassified service. The primary duty and responsibility of the executive director shall be to
continue planning for and management of the resources of the state’s coastal region directors.
46-23-6. Powers and duties — Rights-of-way. Continuing authorities – Powers and
duties – Rights-of-way.
All prior actions taken by the coastal resources management council including, but not
limited to, permits issued, enforcement actions taken, special area management plans, policies and
all duly promulgated regulations remain valid and enforceable by the department. In order to
properly manage coastal resources the council has department is empowered to exercise all the
functions, powers, and duties heretofore vested in the coastal resources management council,
including, but not limited to, the following powers and duties:
LC001019 - Page 8 of 34

(1) Planning and management.(i) The primary responsibility of the council department
shall be the continuing planning for and management of the resources of the state’s coastal region.
The council department shall be able to make any studies of conditions, activities, or problems of
the state’s coastal region needed to carry out its responsibilities.
(ii) The resources management process shall include the following basic phases:
(A) Identify all of the state’s coastal resources, water, submerged land, air space, fin fish,
shellfish, minerals, physiographic features, and so forth.
(B) Evaluate these resources in terms of their quantity, quality, capability for use, and other
key characteristics.
(C) Determine the current and potential uses of each resource.
(D) Determine the current and potential problems of each resource.
(E) Formulate plans and programs for the management of each resource, identifying
permitted uses, locations, protection measures, and so forth.
(F) Carry out these resources management programs through implementing authority and
coordination of state, federal, local, and private activities.
(G) Formulation of standards where these do not exist, and reevaluation of existing
standards.
(H) To develop comprehensive programs for dredging in tidal waters and related beneficial
use, disposal, monitoring dewatering and transportation of dredge materials.
(I) To accept and administer loans and grants from the federal government and from other
sources, public or private, for the carrying out of any of its functions, which loans or grants shall
not be expended for other than the purposes for which provided.
(J) To encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, investigations, research, and
demonstrations relating to dredging, disposal of dredge materials and transportation thereof in the
tidal waters of the state as the coastal resources management council department may deem
advisable and necessary for the discharge of its duties under this chapter.
(K) To collect and disseminate information relating to dredging, disposal of dredge
materials and transportation thereof within the tidal waters of the state.
(L) To work with the appropriate federal and state agencies to develop as provided for in
this chapter and in chapter 6.1 of this title, a comprehensive plan for dredging in tidal waters and
related beneficial use, disposal, monitoring dewatering and transportation of dredge materials.
(M) To apply for, accept and expend grants and bequests of funds, for the purpose of
carrying out the lawful responsibilities of the coastal resources management council department.
(iii) An initial series of resources management activities shall be initiated through this basic
LC001019 - Page 9 of 34

process, then each phase shall continuously be recycled and used to modify the council’s
department's resources management programs and keep them current.
(iv) Planning and management programs shall be formulated in terms of the characteristics
and needs of each resource or group of related resources. However, all plans and programs shall be
developed around basic standards and criteria, including:
(A) The need and demand for various activities and their impact upon ecological systems.
(B) The degree of compatibility of various activities.
(C) The capability of coastal resources to support various activities.
(D) Water quality standards set by the director of the department of environmental
management.
(E) Consideration of plans, studies, surveys, inventories, and so forth prepared by other
public and private sources.
(F) Consideration of contiguous land uses and transportation facilities.
(G) Whenever possible consistency with the state guide plan.
(v) The council department shall prepare, adopt, administer, and cause to be implemented,
including specifically through its powers of coordination as set forth in subdivision (3) of this
section, a marine resources development plan and such special area management plans as the
council department may determine to be appropriate or desirable as follows:
(A) Marine resources development plan.
(I) The purpose of the marine resources development plan shall be to provide an integrated
strategy for: (a) improving the health and functionality of Rhode Island’s marine ecosystem; (b)
providing for appropriate marine-related economic development; and (c) promoting the use and
enjoyment of Rhode Island’s marine resources by the people of the state.
(II) The marine resources development plan shall include specific goals and objectives
necessary to accomplish its purposes, performance measures to determine progress toward
achieving such goals and objectives, and an implementation program.
(III) The marine resources development plan shall be prepared in cooperation with the
department of environmental management, the statewide planning program, and the commerce
corporation, with the involvement of such other state agencies as may be appropriate, and with such
technical support as may be necessary and appropriate from the Narragansett Bay Estuary Program,
the Coastal Institute at the University of Rhode Island, and Rhode Island Sea Grant.
(IV) The plan shall be responsive to the requirements and principles of the federal coastal
zone management act as amended, including, but not limited to, the expectations of the act for
incorporating the federal Clean Water Act into coastal zone management programs.
LC001019 - Page 10 of 34

(V) The marine resources development plan shall take into account local land use
management responsibilities as provided for under title 45 and harbor management responsibilities,
and the preparation of the plan shall include opportunities for involvement and/or comment by
cities and towns.
(VI) The marine resources development plan shall be adopted by the council department
in accordance with the provisions of this subsection by July 1, 2005, shall as appropriate incorporate
the recommendations of the Governor’s Narragansett Bay and Watershed Planning Commission,
and shall be made consistent with systems level plans as appropriate, in order to effectuate the
purposes of systems level planning. The council shall update the marine resources development
plan at least once every five (5) years.
(VII) The council department shall administer its programs, regulations, and
implementation activities in a manner consistent with the marine resources development plan.
(VIII) The marine resources development plan and any updates thereto shall be adopted as
appropriate as elements of the state guide plan pursuant to § 42-11-10.
(B) Special area management plans.
(I) The council department shall adopt such special area management plans as deemed
necessary and desirable to provide for the integration and coordination of the protection of natural
resources, the promotion of reasonable coastal-dependent economic growth, and the improved
protection of life and property in the specific areas designated council by the department as
requiring such integrated planning and coordination.
(II) The integrated planning and coordination herein specified shall include, but not be
limited to, federal agencies, state agencies, boards, commissions, and corporations, including
specifically the commerce corporation, and cities and towns, shall utilize to the extent appropriate
and feasible the capacities of entities of higher education, including Rhode Island Sea Grant, and
shall provide for the participation of advocacy groups, community-based organizations, and private
persons.
(III) The council department shall administer its programs, regulations, and
implementation activities in a manner consistent with special area management plans.
(IV) Special area management plans and any updates thereto shall be adopted as
appropriate as elements of the state guide plan pursuant to § 42-11-10.
(2) Implementation. (i) The council department is authorized to formulate policies and
plans and to adopt regulations necessary to implement its various management programs. With
respect to such policies and plans which relate to matters where the coastal resources management
council department and the department of environmental management have concurrent jurisdiction
LC001019 - Page 11 of 34

and upon formulation of the plans and regulations, the council department shall, prior to adoption,
submit the proposed plans or regulations to the director of the department of environmental
management for the director’s their review. The director of the department of environmental
management shall review and submit comments to the council department within thirty (30) days
of submission to the director of the department of environmental management by the council
department. The comments of the director of the department of environmental management shall
include findings with regard to the consistency of the policies, plans and/or regulations with the
requirements of laws administered by the department of environmental management. The council
director shall consider the director’s director of the department of environmental management's
comments prior to adoption of any such policies, plans or regulations and shall respond in writing
to findings of the director of the department of environmental management with regard to the
consistency of said policies, plans and/or regulations with the requirements of laws administered
by the department of environmental management.
(ii)(A) The council department shall have exclusive jurisdiction below mean high water for
all development, operations, and dredging, consistent with the requirements of chapter 6.1 of this
title and except as necessary for the department of environmental management to exercise its
powers and duties and to fulfill its responsibilities pursuant to §§ 42-17.1-2 and 42-17.1-24, and
any person, firm, or governmental agency proposing any development or operation within, above,
or beneath the tidal water below the mean high water mark, extending out to the extent of the state’s
jurisdiction in the territorial sea, shall be required to demonstrate that its proposal would not:
(I) Conflict with any resources management plan or program;
(II) Make any area unsuitable for any uses or activities to which it is allocated by a
resources management plan or program adopted by the council department; or
(III) Significantly damage the environment of the coastal region.
(B) The council department shall be authorized to approve, modify, set conditions for, or
reject any such proposal.
(iii) The authority of the council department over land areas (those areas above the mean
high water mark) shall be limited to two hundred feet (200′) from the coastal physiographic feature
or to that necessary to carry out effective resources management programs. This shall be limited to
the authority to approve, modify, set conditions for, or reject the design, location, construction,
alteration, and operation of specified activities or land uses when these are related to a water area
under the agency’s jurisdiction, regardless of their actual location. The council’s department's
authority over these land uses and activities shall be limited to situations in which there is a
reasonable probability of conflict with a plan or program for resources management or damage to
LC001019 - Page 12 of 34

the coastal environment. These uses and activities are:
(A) Power generating over forty (40) megawatts and desalination plants.
(B) Chemical or petroleum processing, transfer, or storage.
(C) Minerals extraction.
(D) Shoreline protection facilities and physiographical features, and all directly associated
contiguous areas which are necessary to preserve the integrity of the facility and/or features.
(E) Coastal wetlands and all directly associated contiguous areas which are necessary to
preserve the integrity of the wetlands including any freshwater wetlands located in the vicinity of
the coast. The actual determination of freshwater wetlands located in coastal vicinities and under
the jurisdiction of the coastal resources management council department shall be designated on
such maps that are agreed to in writing and made available for public use by the coastal resources
management council department and the director, department of environmental management,
within three (3) months of [August 6, 1996]. The CRMC department shall have exclusive
jurisdiction over the wetlands areas described in this section notwithstanding any provision of
chapter 1, title 2 or any other provision, except as provided in subsection (iv) of this section. Within
six (6) months of [August 6, 1996] the council The department in cooperation with the director
shall develop and maintain rules and regulations for the management and protection of freshwater
wetlands, affected by an aquaculture project, outside of those freshwater wetlands located in the
vicinity of the coast and under the exclusive jurisdiction of the director of the department of
environmental management. For the purpose of this chapter, a “coastal wetland” means any salt
marsh bordering on the tidal waters of this state, whether or not the tidal waters reach the littoral
areas through natural or artificial watercourses, and those uplands directly associated and
contiguous thereto which are necessary to preserve the integrity of that marsh. Marshes shall
include those areas upon which grow one or more of the following: smooth cordgrass (spartina
alterniflora), salt meadow grass (spartina patens), spike grass (distichlis spicata), black rush (juncus
gerardi), saltworts (salicornia spp.), sea lavender (limonium carolinianum), saltmarsh bulrushes
(scirpus spp.), hightide bush (iva frutescens), tall reed (phragmites communis), tall cordgrass
(spartina pectinata), broadleaf cattail (typha latifolia), narrowleaf cattail (typha angustifolia), spike
rush (eleocharis rostellata), chairmaker’s rush (scirpus amercana), creeping bentgrass (agrostis
palustris), sweet grass (hierochloe odorata), and wild rye (etlymus virginicus).
(F) Sewage treatment and disposal and solid waste disposal facilities.
(G) Beneficial use, dewatering, and disposal of dredged material of marine origins, where
such activities take place within two hundred feet (200′) of mean high water or a coastal
physiographic feature, or where there is a reasonable probability of conflict with a plan or program
LC001019 - Page 13 of 34

for resources management or damage to the coastal environment.
(iv) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (ii) and (iii) above, the department of
environmental management shall maintain jurisdiction over the administration of chapter 1, title 2,
including permitting of freshwater wetlands alterations and enforcement, with respect to all
agricultural activities undertaken by a farmer, as that term is defined in § 2-1-22(j), wherever
located; provided, however, that with respect to activities located partially or completely within
two hundred feet (200′) of the coastal physiographic feature, the department of environmental
management shall exercise jurisdiction in consultation with the council department.
(3) Coordination. The council department has the following coordinating powers and
duties:
(i) Functioning as a binding arbitrator in any matter of dispute involving both the resources
of the state’s coastal region and the interests of two (2) or more municipalities or state agencies.
(ii) Consulting and coordinating actions with local, state, regional, and federal agencies
and private interests.
(iii) Conducting or sponsoring coastal research.
(iv) Advising the governor, the general assembly, and the public on coastal matters.
(v) Serving as the lead state agency and initial and primary point of contact for dredging
activities in tidal waters and in that capacity, integrating and coordinating the plans and policies of
other state agencies as they pertain to dredging in order to develop comprehensive programs for
dredging as required by subparagraph (1)(ii)(H) of this section and chapter 6.1 of this title. The
Rhode Island resource recovery corporation prior to purchasing cover material for the state landfill
shall first contact the CRMC department to see if there is a source of suitable dredged material
available which shall be used in place of the purchase cover material. Other state agencies engaged
in the process of dump closures shall also contact the CRMC department to see if there is a source
of suitable dredged material available, which shall be used in place of the purchase cover material.
In addition, cities and towns may contact the CRMC department prior to closing city or town
controlled dump sites to see if there is a source of suitable dredge material available, which may be
used in place of the purchase cover material.
(vi) Acting as the state’s representative to all bodies public and private on all coastal and
aquaculture related matters.
(4) Operations. The council department is authorized to exercise the following operating
functions, which are essential to management of coastal resources:
(i) Issue, modify, or deny permits for any work in, above, or beneath the areas under its
jurisdiction, including conduct of any form of aquaculture.
LC001019 - Page 14 of 34

(ii) Issue, modify, or deny permits for dredging, filling, or any other physical alteration of
coastal wetlands and all directly related contiguous areas which are necessary to preserve the
integrity of the wetlands, including, but not limited to, the transportation and disposal of dredge
materials in the tidal waters.
(iii) Grant licenses, permits, and easements for the use of coastal resources which are held
in trust by the state for all its citizens, and impose fees for private use of these resources.
(iv) Determining the need for and establishing pierhead, bulkhead, and harbor lines.
(v) Enforcing and implementing riparian rights in the tidal waters after judicial decisions.
(vi) The council department may require an owner or operator of a commercial wharf or
pier of a marine commercial facility, as defined in 300.3 of the Rhode Island coastal resources
management program, but not including those facilities defined in 300.4 of the Rhode Island coastal
resources management program, and which is capable of offloading cargo, and is or will be subject
to a new use or a significant intensification of an existing use, to demonstrate that the commercial
wharf or pier is fit for that purpose. For the purposes of this subsection, a “commercial wharf or
pier” means a pier, bulkhead, wharf, docking facility, or underwater utilities. The council
department may order said owner or operator to provide an engineering certification to the council’s
department's satisfaction that the commercial wharf or pier is fit for the new use or intensification
of an existing use. If the council department determines that the commercial wharf or pier is not fit,
it may order the owner or operator to undertake the necessary work to make the commercial wharf
or pier safe, within a reasonable time frame. If the council department determines that the
commercial wharf or pier, because of its condition, is an immediate threat to public health and
safety it may order the commercial wharf or pier closed until the necessary work to make the
commercial wharf or pier safe has been performed and approved by the council department. All
work performed must conform to the council’s department's management program. The council
department is also given the authority to develop regulations to carry out this provision and to
impose administrative penalties of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day up to a maximum of
twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) consistent with § 46-23-7.1 where there has been a violation of
the orders under this provision.
(5) Rights-of-way.(i) The council department is responsible for the designation of all public
rights-of-way to the tidal water areas of the state, and shall carry on a continuing discovery of
appropriate public rights-of-way to the tidal water areas of the state.
(ii) The council department shall maintain a complete file of all official documents relating
to the legal status of all public rights-of-way to the tidal water areas of the state.
(iii)(A) The council department has the power to designate for acquisition and
LC001019 - Page 15 of 34

development, and posting, and all other functions of any other department for tidal rights-of-way
and land for tidal rights-of-way, parking facilities, and other council related purposes.
(B) Further, the council department has the power to develop and prescribe a standard sign
to be used by the cities and towns to mark designated rights-of-way.
(iv) In conjunction with this subdivision, every state department controlling state-owned
land close to or adjacent to discovered rights-of-way is authorized to set out the land, or so much
of the land that may be deemed necessary for public parking.
(v) No use of land for public parking shall conflict with existing or intended use of the land,
and no improvement shall be undertaken by any state agency until detailed plans have been
submitted to and approved by the governing body of the local municipality.
(vi) In designating rights-of-way, the council department shall consider the following
matters in making its designation:
(A) Land evidence records;
(B) The exercise of domain over the parcel such as maintenance, construction, or upkeep;
(C) The payment of taxes;
(D) The creation of a dedication;
(E) Public use;
(F) Any other public record or historical evidence such as maps and street indexes;
(G) Other evidence as set out in § 42-35-10.
(vii) A determination by the council department that a parcel is a right-of-way shall be
decided by substantial evidence.
(viii) The council department shall be notified whenever by the judgment of the governing
body of a coastal municipality, a public right-of-way to tidal water areas located in such
municipality has ceased to be useful to the public, and such governing body proposes an order of
abandonment of such public right-of-way. Said notice shall be given not less than sixty (60) days
prior to the date of such abandonment.
(6) Pre-existing residential boating facilities.(i) The council department is hereby
authorized and empowered to issue assent for pre-existing residential boating facilities constructed
prior to January 1, 1985. These assents may be issued for pre-existing residential boating facilities,
even though such facilities do not meet current standards and policies of the council department;
provided, however, that the council department finds that such facilities do not pose any significant
risk to the coastal resources of the state of Rhode Island and do not endanger human safety.
(ii) In addition to the above criteria, the applicant shall provide clear and convincing
evidence that:
LC001019 - Page 16 of 34

(A) The facility existed in substantially the same configuration as it now exists prior to
January 1, 1985;
(B) The facility is presently intact and functional; and
(C) The facility presents no significant threat to the coastal resources of the state of Rhode
Island or human safety.
(iii) The applicant, to be eligible for this provision, shall apply no later than January 31,
1999.
(iv) The council department is directed to develop rules and regulations necessary to
implement this subdivision.
(v) It is the specific intent of this subsection to require that all pre-existing residential
boating facilities constructed on January 1, 1985, or thereafter conform to this chapter and the plans,
rules and regulations of the council department.
(7) Lease of filled lands which were formerly tidal lands to riparian or littoral owners.(i)
Any littoral or riparian owner in this state who desires to obtain a lease from the state of Rhode
Island of any filled lands adjacent to his or her upland shall apply to the council department, which
may make the lease. Any littoral or riparian owner who wishes to obtain a lease of filled lands must
obtain pre-approval, in the form of an assent, from the council department. Any lease granted by
the council department shall continue the public’s interest in the filled lands including, but not
limited to, the rights of navigation, fishery, and commerce. The public trust in the lands shall
continue and run concurrently with the leasing of the lands by the state to private individuals,
corporations, or municipalities. Upon the granting of a lease by the council department, those rights
consistent with the public trust and secured by the lease shall vest in the lessee. The council may
approve a lease of filled lands for an initial term of up to fifty (50) years, with, or without, a single
option to renew for an additional term of up to fifty (50) years.
(ii) The lessor of the lease, at any time, for cause, may by express act cancel and annul any
lease previously made to the riparian owner when it determines that the use of the lands is violating
the terms of the lease or is inconsistent with the public trust, and upon cancellation the lands, and
rights in the land so leased, shall revert to the state.
(8) “Marinas” as defined in the coastal resources management program in effect as of June
1, 1997, are deemed to be one of the uses consistent with the public trust. Subdivision (7) is not
applicable to:
(i) Any riparian owner on tidal waters in this state (and any successor in interest to the
owner) which has an assent issued by the council department to use any land under water in front
of his or her lands as a marina, which assent was in effect on June 1, 1997;
LC001019 - Page 17 of 34

(ii) Any alteration, expansion, or other activity at a marina (and any successor in interest)
which has an assent issued by the council, which assent was in effect on June 1, 1997; and
(iii) Any renewal of assent to a marina (or successor in interest), which assent was issued
by the council and in effect on June 1, 1997.
(9) “Recreational boating facilities” including marinas, launching ramps, and recreational
mooring areas, as defined by and properly permitted by the council department, are deemed to be
one of the uses consistent with the public trust. Subdivision (7) is not applicable to:
(i) Any riparian owner on tidal waters in this state (and any successor in interest to the
owner) which has an assent issued by the council to use any land under water in front of his or her
lands as a recreational boating facility; any alteration, expansion or other activity at a recreational
boating facility (and any successor in interest) which has an assent issued by the council, which
assent was in effect as of June 1, 1997; and
(ii) Any renewal of assent to a recreational boating facility (or successor in interest), which
assent was issued by the council and in effect on June 1, 1997.
46-23-6.1. Newport “cliff walk” — Public right-of-way — Legal studies.
The council department is hereby directed to carry out any and all legal studies which it
shall deem necessary in order to designate the Newport “cliff walk”, so called, as a public right-of-
way pursuant to § 46-23-6(5).
46-23-6.2. Abandonment of rights-of-way.
No city or town shall abandon a right-of-way designated as such by the council department
unless the council department approved the abandonment.
46-23-7. Violations.
(a)(1) In any instances wherein there is a violation of the coastal resources management
program, or a violation of regulations or decisions of the council department, the commissioner of
coastal resources management director shall have the power to order any person to cease and desist
or to remedy any violation of any provisions of this chapter, or any rule, regulation, assent, order,
or decision of the council department whenever the commissioner of coastal resources management
director shall have reasonable grounds to believe that such violation has occurred.
(2) Council Department staff, conservation officers within the department of
environmental management, and state and municipal police shall be empowered to issue written
cease and desist orders in any instance where activity is being conducted which constitutes a
violation of any provisions of this chapter, or any rule, regulation, assent, order, or decision of the
council department.
(3) Conservation officers within the department of environmental management, council
LC001019 - Page 18 of 34

department staff, and state and municipal police shall have authority to apply to a court of
competent jurisdiction for a warrant to enter on private land to investigate possible violations of
this chapter; provided, that they have reasonable grounds to believe that a violation has been
committed, is being committed, or is about to be committed.
(b) Any order or notice issued pursuant to subsection (a) shall be eligible for recordation
under chapter 13 of title 34, and shall be recorded in the land evidence records in the city/town
wherein the property subject to the order is located, and any subsequent transferee of the property
shall be responsible for complying with the requirements of the order and notice.
(c) The coastal resources management council department shall discharge of record any
notice filed pursuant to subsection (b) within thirty (30) days after the violation has been remedied.
46-23-7.1. Administrative penalties.
Any person who violates, or refuses or fails to obey, any notice or order issued pursuant to
§ 46-23-7(a); or any assent, order, or decision of the council department, may be assessed an
administrative penalty by the chairperson or executive director in accordance with the following:
(1) The chairperson or executive director is authorized to assess an administrative penalty
of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation of this section, and is authorized
to assess additional penalties of not more than one thousand ($1,000) for each day during which
this violation continues after receipt of a cease-and-desist order from the council department
pursuant to § 46-23-7(a), but in no event shall the penalties in aggregate exceed fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000). Prior to the assessment of a penalty under this subdivision, the property owner
or person committing the violation shall be notified by certified mail or personal service that a
penalty is being assessed. The notice shall include a reference to the section of the law, rule,
regulation, assent, order, or permit condition violated; a concise statement of the facts alleged to
constitute the violation; a statement of the amount of the administrative penalty assessed; and a
statement of the party’s right to an administrative hearing.
(2) The party shall have twenty-one (21) days from receipt of the notice within which to
deliver to the council department a written request for a hearing. This request shall specify in detail
the statements contested by the party. The executive director shall designate a person to act as
hearing officer. If no hearing is requested, then after the expiration of the twenty-one (21) day
period, the council department shall issue a final order assessing the penalty specified in the notice.
The penalty is due when the final order is issued. If the party shall request a hearing, any additional
daily penalty shall not commence to accrue until the council department issues a final order.
(3) If a violation is found to have occurred, the council department may issue a final order
assessing not more than the amount of the penalty specified in the notice. The penalty is due when
LC001019 - Page 19 of 34

the final order is issued.
(4) The party may within thirty (30) days appeal the final order, of fine assessed by the
council department to the superior court which shall hear the assessment of the fine de novo.
46-23-7.2. Proceedings for enforcement.
The superior court shall have jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the
coastal resource management program, or any rule, regulation, assent, or order issued pursuant
thereto. Proceedings under this section may follow the course of equity, and shall be instituted and
prosecuted in the name of and at the direction of the chairperson and council director by the attorney
general or counsel designated by the council director. Proceedings provided in this section shall be
in addition to, and may be utilized in lieu of, other administrative or judicial proceedings authorized
by this chapter.
46-23-7.4. Penalty for blocking or posting of rights-of-way.
Any person who shall post or block any tidal water, public right-of-way, as designated by
the council department, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or
by imprisonment for not more than three (3) months or both; and each day the posting or blocking
continues or is repeated shall be deemed a separate offense. The chairperson of the council, through
council’s legal counsel director or the attorney general, may apply to any court of competent
jurisdiction for an injunction to prevent the unlawful posting or blocking of any tidal water, public
right-of-way.
46-23-7.5. Prosecution of criminal violations.
The chairperson and anyone designated by the chairperson director, without being required
to enter into any recognizance or to give surety for cost, may institute proceedings in the name of
the state. It shall be the duty of the attorney general and/or the solicitor of the city or town in which
the alleged violation has occurred to conduct the prosecution of all the proceedings. The
chairperson director may delegate his or her authority to bring prosecution by complaint and
warrant to any law enforcement officials authorized by law to bring complaints for the issuance of
search or arrest warrants pursuant to chapters 5 and 6 of title 12.
46-23-8. Gifts, grants, and donations.
The council department is authorized to receive any gifts, grants, or donations made for
any of the purposes of its program, which shall be deposited as general revenues, and to disburse
and administer the gifts, grants, or donations amounts appropriated in accordance with the terms
thereof. The council department is authorized to receive any sums provided by an applicant for use
by the council department in its hearing process, which shall be deposited as general revenues, and
to disburse and administer the general revenue amounts appropriated in accordance with the rules
LC001019 - Page 20 of 34

and regulations promulgated by the council department.
46-23-9. Subpoena.
The council department is hereby authorized and empowered to summon witnesses and
issue subpoenas in substantially the following form:
Sc.
To _______________________ of __________________________ greeting:
You are hereby required, in the name of the state of Rhode Island, to make your appearance
before the commission on _______________________ department of coastal resources in the
________________________ city of _____________________ on the ____________________
day of ___________________ to give evidence of what you know relative to a matter upon
investigation by the commission on ______________________________ department of coastal
resources and produce and then and there have and give the following:
Hereof fail not, as you will answer to default under the penalty of the law in that behalf
made and provided.
Dated at ________________ the ________________ day of ________________ in the
year _____________
46-23-10. Cooperation of departments.
All other departments and agencies and bodies of state government are hereby authorized
and directed to cooperate with and furnish such information as the council department shall require.
46-23-11. Rules and regulations.
The rules and regulations promulgated by the council department shall be subject to the
Administrative Procedures Act ("chapter 35 of title 42").
46-23-13. Application and hearing fees.
The council department shall be authorized to establish reasonable fees for applications
and hearings. All fees collected by the council department, including fees collected for leases, shall
be deposited as general revenues. The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his
or her orders upon the general treasurer for payment of such sum or sums as may be necessary from
time to time and upon receipt by him or her of duly authenticated vouchers presented by the
commissioner of coastal resources management director.
46-23-14. Expert testimony.
The council department shall be authorized to engage its own expert and outside
consultants, and the council department shall be empowered to use that testimony in making its
decisions.
46-23-15. Federal grants and interstate cooperation.
LC001019 - Page 21 of 34

The council department is authorized to accept any federal grants. It is further given the
power to administer land and water use regulations as necessary to fulfill their responsibilities under
the Federal Coastal Zone Management Act, 16 U.S.C. § 1451 et seq., and to acquire fee simple and
less than fee simple interests under any federal or state program. The council department is
authorized to coordinate and cooperate with other states in furtherance of its purposes. The council
department may expend those grants and appropriations. The coastal resources management
council department for the purposes of the federal Coastal Zone Management Act, 16 U.S.C. §
1451 et seq., is the coastal zone agency under §§ 301 through 313 and §§ 318 and 6217 of said act.
46-23-15.1. Coordination of harbor safety and enforcement patrols.
Coastal municipalities which share a common boundary along their public waters may
enter into a binding memorandum of agreement allowing for harbormasters and other officials
charged with enforcement of harbor management plan harbor ordinances from one coastal
municipality to enforce the harbor ordinances of the bordering coastal municipality upon the public
waters of the bordering coastal municipality when the coastal municipalities have harbor
management plans approved by the coastal resources management council department and the
memorandum of agreement is approved by the respective town or city councils. This binding
memorandum of agreement shall specify how each coastal municipality is to receive any fines
collected under this reciprocal enforcement agreement and the jurisdiction in which any disputes
arising out of this reciprocal enforcement agreement shall be litigated.
46-23-16. Length of permits, licenses, and easements.
The council department is authorized to grant permits, licenses, and easements for any term
of years or in perpetuity. Permits, licenses, or easements which are issued by the council department
for the filling of the submerged or submersible lands of the state of Rhode Island remain subject to
the public trust, and no title is conveyed by such documents. All such permits, licenses, and
easements shall clearly state that no title is being conveyed. Permits, licenses or easements issued
by the council department are valid only with the conditions and stipulation under which they are
granted and imply no guarantee of renewal. The initial application or an application for renewal
may be subject to denial or modification. If an application is granted, said permit, license and
easement may be subject to revocation and/or modification for failure to comply with the conditions
and stipulations under which the same was issued or for other good cause. The division of coastal
resources of the department of environmental management shall transfer all of the records and files
of the former division of harbours and rivers to the council department.
46-23-18. Prohibited activities.
(a) No person, either as principal, agent or servant nor any firm, corporation, or any other
LC001019 - Page 22 of 34

entity shall, without a permit issued by the coastal resources management council department,
construct a marina within two thousand feet (2000′) of a shellfish management area as defined by
rules and regulations of the department of environmental management. Such permit shall include
any permit required under subsection (b).
(b) No person, either as principal, agent, or servant, or any firm, corporation or any other
entity, shall, within the tidal waters of the state, conduct or cause to conduct dredging,
transportation and/or disposal of dredge materials without a permit issued by the coastal resources
management council department, a water quality certification issued by the department of
environmental management pursuant to chapter 12 of this title and any permit required by the army
corps of engineers. In addition, no person, either as principal, agent, or servant, nor any firm,
corporation or any other entity, shall dispose of dredge materials other than in tidal waters without
any permit, approval or certification that may otherwise be required.
46-23-18.1. Permitting.
(a) Any person, either as principal, agent, or servant, or any firm, corporation or any other
entity desiring to conduct any activity or activities specified in § 46-23-18 shall file an application
for a permit with the coastal resources management council department upon forms furnished by
coastal resources management council the department.
(b) A hearing shall be held on the application within thirty (30) days of filing.
(c) The applicant shall bear the burden of proving that the activity or activities specified in
the application will cause no significant adverse impact upon the environment or natural resources
of the state, and the coastal resources management council department shall be empowered to deny
the application if the applicant does not demonstrate, in addition to other requirements of this
chapter, that the activity or activities will not:
(i) Significantly adversely affect any shellfish management area as designated by the
department of environmental management or the marine fisheries council;
(ii) Be in a significant conflict with the marine ecology within or adjacent to the state’s
territorial waters; or
(iii) Significantly harm or destroy existing fishing grounds.
(d) With respect to an application seeking a permit from the coastal resources management
council department to conduct or cause to conduct dredging, transportation and/or disposal of
dredge material, the applicant shall also satisfy the council department that the proposal in the
application is consistent with a comprehensive program developed pursuant to § 46-23-6(1)(ii)(H).
(e) In determining whether an applicant has met the burden of proof under subsection (c),
the coastal resources management council department shall apply standards that conform with the
LC001019 - Page 23 of 34

federal Environmental Protection Agency’s applicable standards and guidelines for the
management of dredge materials, including, but not limited to, the federal Environmental
Protection Agency’s rules, regulations and guidelines for deviating from said standards.
(f) The applicant shall, at least three (3) days before commencing any dredging, give
written notice to the coastal resources management council department of the intent to commence
the activities specified in the permit.
46-23-18.2. Rules and regulations.
The council, upon recommendation by the coastal resources advisory committee,
department shall issue and maintain reasonable rules and regulations governing the dredging,
transporting and disposal of all dredge materials in accordance with this chapter.
46-23-18.3. Sites for disposal of spoil from dredge operations, selection.
(a) The council department, upon recommendation of the coastal resources community
advisory committee, on or before the first day of January, 1999 and periodically thereafter as
necessary, shall and consistent with the comprehensive programs required in § 46-23-6(1)(ii)(H),
shall identify and establish one or more in-water disposal sites to be used for the purpose of disposal
of dredge materials from marinas and yacht clubs.
(b) The council department, upon recommendation of the coastal resources advisory
committee, on or before the first day of January, 2002 and periodically thereafter as necessary, shall
consistent with the comprehensive programs required in § 46-23-6(1)(ii)(H) identify and establish
one or more in-water disposal sites to be used for the purpose of disposal of dredge materials from
all sources not otherwise delineated in (a) above.
46-23-18.4. Enforcement.
The provisions of §§ 46-23-18 through 46-23-18.3 this chapter shall be enforced by the
coastal resources management council department. Nothing herein shall be deemed to abrogate the
department of environmental management’s authority to enforce its water quality standards adopted
pursuant to § 46-12-3(7) or (24).
46-23-18.5. Fees for disposal.
The council department is authorized to impose a fee of not less than eleven dollars and
sixty-five cents ($11.65) per cubic yard for the disposal of dredge materials at the sites established
by the council department pursuant to § 46-23-18.3, with eleven dollars and sixty-five cents
($11.65) being deposited into the general fund. The amount of the fee established by the council
department pursuant to the section shall be reviewed by the council department on an annual basis
and revised as the council department deems necessary, but in no event shall the fee be set at an
amount less than eleven dollars and sixty-five cents ($11.65) per cubic yard of material.
LC001019 - Page 24 of 34

46-23-18.6. Coastal Resources Management Council Dredge Fund.
There is hereby created a separate fund to be held by the coastal resources management
council department to be known as the dredge fund. Any amount charged above the eleven dollars
and sixty-five cents ($11.65) must be deposited into the fund and shall not be deposited into the
general fund of the state, but shall be kept by the general treasurer of the state in a separate fund
for the coastal resources management council department, and shall be paid out by the treasurer
upon the order of the council director, without the necessity of appropriation or re-appropriation by
the general assembly. Funds must be used to create additional dredging and disposal options.
46-23-20. Administrative hearings.
All contested cases, all contested enforcement proceedings, and all contested
administrative fines shall be heard by the administrative hearing officers, or by subcommittees as
provided in § 46-23-20.1, pursuant to the regulations promulgated by the council department;
provided, however, that no proceeding and hearing prior to the appointment of the hearing officers
shall be subject to the provisions of this section. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the commissioner
of coastal resources management director shall be authorized, in his or her the director's discretion,
to resolve contested licensing and enforcement proceedings through informal disposition pursuant
to regulations promulgated by the council department.
46-23-20.1. Hearing officers — Appointment — Compensation — Subcommittee.
Hearing officers -- Appointment -- Compensation.
(a) The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint two (2) hearing
officers at least one hearing officer who shall be attorneys-at-law an attorney-at-law, who, prior to
their appointment, shall have practiced law for a period of not less than five (5) years for a term of
five (5) years; provided, however, if more than one hearing officer is to be appointed, that the initial
appointments shall be as follows: one hearing officer shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years
and one hearing officer , if additional hearing officers are appointed, they shall each be appointed
for a term of five (5) years. The appointees shall be addressed as hearing officers.
(b) The governor shall designate one of the hearing officers as chief hearing officer. The
hearing officers shall hear proceedings as provided by this section, and the council department,
with the assistance of the chief hearing officer, may shall promulgate such rules and regulations as
shall be necessary or desirable and consistent with the department of environmental management
administrative adjudication regulation to effect the purposes of this section.
(c) A hearing officer shall be devoted full time to these administrative duties, and shall not
otherwise practice law while holding office nor be a partner nor an associate of any person in the
practice of law.
LC001019 - Page 25 of 34

(d) Compensation for hearing officers shall be determined by the unclassified pay board.
(e) Whenever the chairperson of the coastal resources management council or, in the
absence of the chairperson, the commissioner of coastal resources makes a finding that the hearing
officers are otherwise engaged and unable to hear a matter in a timely fashion, he or she may
appoint a subcommittee which will act as hearing officers in any contested case coming before the
council. The subcommittee shall consist of at least one member; provided, however, that in all
contested cases an additional member shall be a resident of the coastal community affected. The
city or town council of each coastal community shall, at the beginning of its term of office, appoint
a resident of that city or town to serve as an alternate member of the aforesaid subcommittee should
there be no existing member of the coastal resources management council from that city or town
available to serve on the subcommittee. Any member of the subcommittee actively engaged in
hearing a case shall continue to hear the case, even though his or her term may have expired, until
the case is concluded and a vote taken thereon. Hearings before subcommittees shall be subject to
all rules of practice and procedure as govern hearings before hearing officers. Notwithstanding any
other law to the contrary, if a hearing officer is not appointed, confirmed and engaged within sixty
(60) days of the effective date of this section, or the position of hearing officer is vacant for more
than sixty (60) days, the director shall hire a hearing officer, who shall be in the unclassified service,
for a term of five (5) years and shall meet the requirements set forth in subsections (c) and (d) of
this section.
(f) If at least one hearing officer has been appointed, confirmed and engaged or hired by
the director and is unable to hear a matter in a timely manner as required by law, the director may
hire a hearing officer employed by the state in such capacity, who shall have practiced law for a
period of not less than five (5) years and meets the requirements set forth in subsection (c) of this
section to adjudicate pending contested cases.
46-23-20.2. Clerk.
The commissioner of coastal resources director or his or her designee shall serve as clerk
to the hearing officers. The clerk shall have general charge of the office, keep a full record of
proceedings, file and preserve all documents and papers, prepare such papers and notices as may
be required, and perform such other duties as required. The commissioner director shall have the
power to issue subpoenas for witnesses and documents and to administer oaths in all cases before
any hearing officer or pertaining to the duties of his or her office.
46-23-20.3. Prehearing procedure.
(a) Prior to the commencement of any hearing, the hearing officer may in his or her
discretion direct the parties or their attorneys to appear before him or her for such conferences as
LC001019 - Page 26 of 34

shall be necessary. At the conferences, the hearing officer may order any party to file, prior to the
commencement of any formal hearing, exhibits that the party intends to use in the hearing, and the
names and addresses of witnesses that the party intends to produce in its direct case, together with
a short statement of the testimony of each witness. Following entry of an order, a party shall not be
permitted, except in the discretion of the hearing officer, to introduce into evidence, in the party’s
direct case, exhibits which are not filed in accordance with the order. At the conference, the hearing
officer may designate a date before which he or she requires any party to specify what issues are
conceded, and further proof of conceded issues shall not be required. The hearing officer shall also
require the parties to simplify the issues, to consider admissions of fact and of documents which
will avoid unnecessary proof, and to limit the number of expert witnesses. The hearing officer shall
enter an order reciting the concessions and agreements made by the parties, and shall enter an order
on such other matters as are pertinent to the conduct of the hearing, and unless modified, the hearing
shall be conducted by the order.
(b) The hearing officer may also order the parties to file, prior to the commencement of
any hearing, the testimony of any or all of their respective witnesses, and to submit the testimony
to the hearing officer and the opposing party or the opposing counsel by such date as the hearing
officer shall determine. The witness shall testify under oath, and all of the testimony shall be in a
question and answer format. Save for good cause shown, said testimony shall be the direct
examination of the witness; provided, however, that the witness shall be available at the hearing
for cross-examination by the opposing party or opposing counsel.
(c) The council department, with the assistance of the chief hearing officer, shall
promulgate, by regulation, such other prehearing procedures and/or hearing procedures as deemed
necessary, including the use of portions of the superior court civil rules of discovery where such
are not inconsistent with the applicable provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter
35 of title 42.
46-23-20.4. Hearings — Orders.
(a) Subject to the provisions of this chapter, every hearing for the adjudication of a violation
or for a contested matter shall be held before a hearing officer or a subcommittee. The If more than
one hearing officer is appointed, the chief hearing officer shall assign a hearing officer to each
matter not assigned to a subcommittee. After due consideration of the evidence and arguments, the
hearing officer shall make written proposed findings of fact and proposed conclusions of law which
shall be made public when submitted to the council department for review. The council director
may, in its their discretion, adopt, modify, or reject the findings of fact and/or conclusions of law;
provided, however, that any modification or rejection of the proposed findings of fact or
LC001019 - Page 27 of 34

conclusions of law shall be in writing and shall state the rationales therefor.
(b) The director of the department of environmental management and the coastal resources
management council director shall promulgate such rules and regulations, not inconsistent with
law, as to assure uniformity of proceedings as applicable.
46-23-20.5. Ex parte consultations.
Council members The department shall have no communication directly or indirectly, with
a hearing officer relating to any issue of fact or of law on any matter then pending before the hearing
officer.
46-23-20.6. Oaths — Subpoenas — Powers of hearing officers.
The hearing officers are hereby severally authorized and empowered to administer oaths,
and the hearing officers, in all cases of every nature pending before them, are hereby authorized
and empowered to summon and examine witnesses and to compel the production and examination
of papers, books, accounts, documents, records, certificates and other legal evidence that may be
necessary or proper for the determination and decision of any question before or the discharge of
any duty required by law of the hearing officer. All subpoenas and subpoena duces tecum shall be
signed by a hearing officer or the commissioner of coastal resources director, and shall be served
as subpoenas are served in civil cases in the superior court; and witnesses so subpoenaed shall be
entitled to the same fees for attendance and travel as are provided for witnesses in civil cases in the
superior court. In cases of contumacy or refusal to obey the command of the subpoena so issued,
the superior court shall have jurisdiction upon application of the council department with proof by
affidavit of the fact, to issue a rule or order returnable, in not less than two (2) nor more than five
(5) days, directing the person to show cause why he or she should not be adjudged in contempt.
Upon return of such order, the justice, before whom the matter is brought for hearing, shall examine
under oath the person, and the person shall be given an opportunity to be heard, and if the justice
shall determine that the person has refused without reasonable cause or legal excuse to be examined
or to answer legal or pertinent questions, he or she may impose a fine upon the offender or forthwith
commit the offender to the adult correctional institutions, there to remain until he or she submits to
do the act which he or she was so required to do, or is discharged according to law.
46-23-21. Notice of permit — Recordation.
A notice of permit shall be eligible for recordation under chapter 13 of title 34 as
determined by the executive director, and shall be recorded at the expense of the applicant in the
land evidence records of the city or town where the property subject to permit is located, and any
subsequent transferee of the property shall be responsible for complying with the terms and
conditions of the permit. The clerk of the various cities and towns shall record any orders, findings,
LC001019 - Page 28 of 34

or decisions of the council department at no expense to the council department.
46-23-22. Solid waste disposal licenses — Hearings.
The chairperson of the coastal resources management council director and the
commissioner of the environmental protection branch director of the department of environmental
management shall coordinate concurrent hearings on solid waste disposal license applications;
provided, however, that the chairperson director and the commissioner of the environmental
protection branch director of the department of environmental management may designate a
hearing officer or subcommittee to hear all matters pertaining to the application and; provided
further, that the hearing officer may be from the department of environmental management, the
coastal resources management council hearing officer, a subcommittee department, or an ad hoc
hearing officer. The commissioner of coastal resources management with the approval of the
chairperson director may waive jurisdiction in those instances where the commissioner director
finds that there is no substantive coastal resources issue or that another agency or branch has
adjudicated or addressed the issue.
46-23-23. Municipal comprehension plan consideration.
The coastal resources management council department shall conform to the requirements
of the Comprehensive Planning and Land Use Regulation Act, § 45-22.2.
46-23-24. Lien on property.
The executive director may record the notice of fee or final order of fine as a lien on the
subject property in the land evidence records of the town or city in which said property is located.
Recordation of said fee or final order of fine shall be the only manner by which said lien may be
perfected against the subject property.
46-23-25. Issuance of beach vehicle registration permits.
(a) The coastal resources management council department may issue beach vehicle
registration permits in accordance with § 31-8-1.1 of the general laws and adopt regulations that
the council department deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The council
department may appoint responsible citizens or corporations of the state, engaged in operating
sporting goods stores to act as agents with authority to issue permits in the manner and under the
conditions as set forth below. Before an appointment shall occur, that citizen or corporation of the
state shall deliver to the council department a bond with a surety company authorized to do business
in the state of Rhode Island. The requirements and conditions of the bond shall be established by
the regulations.
(b) Any person or corporation appointed by the council department as provided in section
(a) above shall, upon the application of any person entitled to receive a permit under this chapter
LC001019 - Page 29 of 34

and upon payment of the specified permit fee, register and issue to the person a beach vehicle
registration permit in the form prescribed and furnished by the council department. The permit shall
bear the name, place of residence, and signature of the registrant, and the vehicle make, model,
year, and license plate number and shall authorize the registrant to own and operate a beach vehicle
in the state of Rhode Island during those seasons and in those manners and according to those
conditions as shall be provided by regulations established by the council department.
46-23-26. The public’s rights and privileges of the shore.
(a) The public’s rights and privileges of the shore are established by Article I, Sections 16
and 17 of the Rhode Island Constitution.
(b) For purposes of this chapter, the “recognizable high tide line” means a line or mark left
upon tidal flats, beaches, or along shore objects that indicates the intersection of the land with the
water’s surface level at the maximum height reached by a rising tide. The recognizable high tide
line may be determined by a line of seaweed, oil or scum along shore objects, a more or less
continuous deposit of fine shell or debris on the foreshore or berm, other physical markings or
characteristics, or other suitable means that delineate the general height reached by the water’s
surface level at a rising tide. If there is more than one line of seaweed, oil, scum, fine shell, or
debris, then the recognizable high tide line means the most seaward line. In the absence of residue
seaweed or other evidence, the recognizable high tide line means the wet line on a sandy or rocky
beach. The line encompasses the water’s surface level at spring high tides and other high tides that
occur with periodic frequency, but does not include the water’s surface level at storm surges in
which there is a departure from the normal or predicted reach of the water’s surface level due to
the piling up of water against a coast by strong winds, such as those accompanying a hurricane or
other intense storms.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of the general laws to the contrary, the public’s rights
and privileges of the shore may be exercised, where shore exists, on wet sand or dry sand or rocky
beach, up to ten feet (10′) landward of the recognizable high tide line; provided, however, that the
public’s rights and privileges of the shore shall not be afforded where no passable shore exists, nor
on land above the vegetation line, or on lawns, rocky cliffs, sea walls, or other legally constructed
shoreline infrastructure. Further, no entitlement is hereby created for the public to use amenities
privately owned by other persons or entities, including, but not limited to: cabanas, decks, and
beach chairs.
(d) Any landowner whose property abuts the shore shall, with respect to the public’s
exercise of rights and privileges of the shore as defined in this chapter, be afforded the liability
limitations pursuant to chapter 6 of title 32.
LC001019 - Page 30 of 34

(e) The coastal resources management council (CRMC) department in collaboration with
the department of environmental management (DEM), shall develop and disseminate information
to educate the public and property owners about the rights set out in this section.
(f) The CRMC department in collaboration with the DEM, and the attorney general, shall
determine appropriate language and signage details for use at shoreline locations.
SECTION 3. Chapter 46-23 of the General Laws entitled "Coastal Resources Management
Council" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
46-23-27. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is
held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter, which
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of
this chapter are declared to be severable.
46-23-28. Effective date.
(a) Within thirty (30) business days of the date of passage of this act, the department shall
put out for notice and comment revisions of its coastal resources management program (referred to
as "red book") and management procedures in order to implement the programmatic changes from
the council to the department.
(b) Within seven (7) days of promulgation of the revised coastal resources management
program (referred to as "red book") and management procedures, the department shall submit a
coastal zone management act program change request to the National Oceanic and Atmospheric
Administration (NOAA) for the approval of the amendments to this statute and the management
procedures. The remaining sections of this statute shall take effect upon NOAA's approval.
SECTION 4. Sections 46-23-2.1, 46-23-3, 46-23-5, 46-23-6.3 and 46-23-12 of the General
Laws in Chapter 46-23 entitled "Coastal Resources Management Council" are hereby repealed.
46-23-2.1. Members — Term of office — Vacancies.
(a) The term of office of the appointed members shall be three (3) years, only so long as
the members shall remain eligible to serve on the council under the appointment authority.
(b) The members are eligible for successive appointments.
(c) Elected or appointed municipal officials shall hold seats on the council, only so long as
they remain in their elected or appointed office.
(d) A vacancy other than by expiration shall be filled in the manner of the original
appointment but only for the unexpired portion of the term. The governor shall have the power to
remove his or her appointee for just cause.
46-23-3. Oath of members.
LC001019 - Page 31 of 34

Each appointed member of the council, before entering upon his or her duties, shall take
an oath to administer the duties of his or her office faithfully and impartially, and the oath shall be
filed in the office of the secretary of state.
46-23-5. Expenses of members.
(a) The members of the council and the chairperson shall not be compensated for their
service on the board, but the members and chairperson shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses
necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.
(b) [Deleted by P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 34.]
46-23-6.3. Tolling of expiration periods.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision set forth in this chapter, all periods pertaining to
the expiration of any approval or permit issued pursuant to any state statute or any regulation
promulgated thereto pertaining to the development of property shall be tolled until June 30, 2016.
For the purposes of this section, “tolling” means the suspension or temporary stopping of the
running of the applicable permit or approval period.
(b) Said tolling need not be recorded in the land evidence records to be valid, however, a
notice of the tolling must be posted in the municipal planning department and near the land evidence
records.
(c) The tolling shall apply only to approvals or permits in effect on November 9, 2009, and
those issued between November 9, 2009, and June 30, 2016, and shall not revive expired approvals
or permits.
(d) The expiration dates for all permits and approvals issued before the tolling period began
will be recalculated as of July 1, 2016, by adding thereto the number of days between November
9, 2009, and the day on which the permit or approval would otherwise have expired. The expiration
dates for all permits and approvals issued during the tolling period will be recalculated as of July
1, 2016, by adding thereto the number of days between the day the permit or approval was issued
and the day the permit or approval otherwise would have expired.
46-23-12. Representation from coastal communities.
Upon the expiration of a term of a member appointed by the governor, as an appointed or
elected official of local government from a coastal municipality as set out in § 46-23-2, the governor
shall appoint an appointed or elected official of a coastal municipality which, at the time of the
governor’s appointment, has no appointed or ex officio representation on the council.
LC001019 - Page 32 of 34

SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001019
========
LC001019 - Page 33 of 34